Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 6. Filings.

Sec. 10.55.601.
Requirements for documents.

To be entitled to filing by the department under this chapter, a document must satisfy the following requirements and the requirements of any other provision of this chapter that adds to or varies these requirements:

this chapter must require or permit filing the document with the department;

the document must contain the information required by this chapter and may contain other information;

the document must be in a record;

the document must be in the English language; however, the name of an entity need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals;

the document must be signed

by an officer of a domestic or foreign corporation;

by a person authorized by a domestic or foreign entity that is not a corporation; or

if the entity is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary;

the document must state the name and capacity of the person that signed it; the document may contain a corporate seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification; and

the document must be delivered to the department for filing; delivery may be made by electronic transmission if and to the extent permitted by the department; if a document is filed in typewritten or printed form and not transmitted electronically, the department may require one exact or conformed copy to be delivered with the document.

When a document is delivered to the department for filing, the correct filing fee and any franchise tax, license fee, or penalty required to be paid for the filing by this chapter or other law must be paid or provision for payment made in a manner permitted by the department.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.602.
Forms.

The department may prescribe and furnish on request forms for documents required or permitted to be filed by this chapter, but their use is not mandatory.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.603.
Filing, service, and copying fees.

The department shall collect a fee each time process is served on the commissioner under this chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process may recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The department shall collect the fees for copying and certifying the copy of any document filed under this chapter for copying and for the certificate.

The department shall collect fees when the following documents are delivered for filing:

statement of merger;

statement of abandonment of merger;

statement of interest exchange;

statement of abandonment of interest exchange;

statement of conversion;

statement of abandonment of conversion;

statement of domestication;

statement of abandonment of domestication.

The department shall establish by regulation under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) the amount of the fees to be collected under this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Rule 79, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 30(a), ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.55.604.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as provided in AS

10.55.605

, a document accepted for filing is effective

at the date and time of filing, as evidenced by the means used by the department for recording the date and time of filing;

at the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed;

at a specified delayed effective time and date, if permitted by this chapter; or

if a delayed effective date but no time is specified, at the close of business on the date specified.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.605.
Correcting filed document.

A domestic or foreign entity may correct a document filed by the department if

the document contains an inaccuracy;

the document was defectively signed; or

the electronic transmission of the document to the department was defective.

A document is corrected by filing with the department a statement of correction that

describes the document to be corrected and states the filing date of the document to be corrected or has attached a copy of the document;

specifies the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected; and

corrects the inaccuracy or defect.

A statement of correction is effective on the effective date of the document it corrects except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, a statement of correction is effective when filed.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.606.
Filing duty of department.

A document delivered to the department for filing that satisfies the requirements of AS

10.55.601

shall be filed by the department.

The department files a document by recording it as filed on the date and time of receipt. After filing a document, the department shall deliver to the domestic or foreign entity or its representative a copy of the document with an acknowledgment of the date and time of filing.

If the department refuses to file a document, the department shall return the document to the domestic or foreign entity or its representative within 10 days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

The duty of the department to file documents under this section is ministerial. The filing or refusal to file a document does not

affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document; or

create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.607.
Appeal from refusal to file a document.

If the department refuses to file a document delivered for filing, the domestic or foreign entity that submitted the document for filing may, within 30 days after the return of the document, appeal the refusal to the superior court of the judicial district where the entity’s principal office, or, if the entity does not have a principal office in this state, where its registered office is or will be located. The appeal is begun by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the explanation of the department for the refusal to file.

The court may summarily order the department to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Rules 602(b), 602(c), and 605.5, Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure, see sec. 30(b) — (d), ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.55.608.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate from the department, delivered with a copy of a document filed by the department, conclusively establishes that the original document is on file with the department.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.609.
Penalty for signing false document.

A person who signs a document the person knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the department for filing under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 10.55.610.
Interrogatories by department; judicial review.

The department may propound to a domestic or foreign entity that is a party to a transaction under this chapter interrogatories reasonably necessary and proper to enable the department to ascertain whether the entity has complied with the provisions of this chapter.

Interrogatories shall be answered within 30 days or within the additional time fixed by the department. Answers shall be full and complete, in writing and under oath. If the interrogatories are directed to an individual, the interrogatories shall be answered by that person, and, if directed to an entity, the interrogatories shall be answered by the president, vice-president, secretary, or assistant secretary of the corporation or, in the instance of a foreign corporation, the person or persons functioning as comparable officers in accordance with the laws of the state of incorporation.

A petition stating good cause to extend the date to answer, modify, or set aside the interrogatories propounded by the department or to enforce compliance with AS

10.55.620

may be filed in the superior court before the expiration of the 30 days fixed in this section for answer.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.615.
Confidentiality of information disclosed by interrogatories.

Interrogatories and answers propounded and obtained under AS

10.55.610

are not open to public inspection and the department may not disclose facts or information obtained from the interrogatories except as the official duty of the department requires or unless the interrogatories or the answers are required for evidence in criminal proceedings or other action by the state.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.620.
Failure or refusal to answer interrogatories.

Unless otherwise provided by an order of court issued in response to a petition filed under AS

10.55.610

,

an entity that fails or refuses to answer truthfully and fully interrogatories propounded by the department within the time prescribed by AS

10.55.610(b)

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor; and

the department need not file a document to which the interrogatories relate until the interrogatories are properly answered and need not file a document to which the interrogatories relate if the answers disclose that the document does not conform to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 10.55.625.
Powers of department.

The department has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required by this chapter.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)